Hawaii statutes.
§435C-2 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Medical malpractice insurance" means
insurance coverage against the legal liability of the insured and against loss,
damage, or expense incident to a claim arising out of the death or injury of
any person as the result of negligence or malpractice in rendering professional
service by any licensed physician or hospital.

"Net direct premiums" means general
casualty insurance direct premiums written as reported on the Hawaii State Page
of the Exhibit of Premium and Losses of the annual statement under medical
malpractice, workers' compensation, and other liability lines of business.

"Plan" means the joint underwriting
plan established pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. [L 1975, c 161, pt
of §1 and am c 41, §1; am L 1979, c 164, §1; am L 1998, c 204, §1]

Revision Note

Definitions restyled and rearranged.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next